Maryland, session 2025, SB0755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
18–303.
(a) Subject to subsection [(e)] (F) of this section, each recipient of a Delegate
Howard P. Rawlings Educational Excellence Award shall:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0755*

SENATE BILL 755
(1) Be accepted for admission in the regular undergraduate program at an
eligible institution or be enrolled in a 2–year associate degree program in which the course
work is acceptable for transfer credit for an accredited baccalaureate program in an eligible
institution;
(2) Except as provided in § 18–303.2 of this subtitle, be a resident of this
State;
(3) Demonstrate a definite financial need to:
(i) For an Educational Assistance Grant, the Office; or
(ii) For a Guaranteed Access Grant, the Office or an institution of
higher education that complies with § 18–303.3 of this subtitle; and
(4) Accept any other conditions attached to the award.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section AND SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, each recipient of a Guaranteed Access Grant shall:
(1) Have completed high school or, failing to do so, on the recommendation
of the recipient’s high school principal, provide evidence satisfactory to the Office of
extenuating circumstances;
(2) Begin college within 6 years of completing high school or, failing to do
so, provide evidence satisfactory to the Office of extenuating circumstances;
(3) Be under the age of 26 years at the time of receiving the first award;
(4) Enroll in college as a full–time student;
(5) Subject to subsection [(d)] (E) of this section, have an annual family
income below a poverty index determined by the Commission; and
(6) Satisfy any additional criteria the Commission may establish.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, an individual who has
successfully obtained a high school diploma by examination under § 11–808 of the Labor
and Employment Article is exempt from the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.
(2) An individual described under paragraph (1) of this subsection is
eligible for a Guaranteed Access Grant if the individual:
(i) Has scored a passing score of at least 145 per module on the
diploma by examination;

SENATE BILL 755 3
(ii) Begins college within 6 years of achieving the score described
under item (i) of this paragraph or, failing to do so, provides evidence satisfactory to the
Office of extenuating circumstances;
(iii) Is under the age of 26 years at the time of receiving the first
award;
(iv) Enrolls in college as a full–time student; and
(v) Subject to [subsection (d)] SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (E) of this
section, has an annual family income below a poverty index determined by the Commission.
(D) (1) IN ADDITION TO MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS IN AN INFORMAL KINSHIP CARE
RELATIONSHIP SHALL BE CONSIDERED INDEPENDENT BY THE COMMISSION FOR
STATE STUDENT FINANCIAL AID PURPOSES.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS
ELIGIBLE FOR A GUARANTEED ACCESS GRANT IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) PARTICIPATES IN AN INFORMAL KINSHIP CARE
RELATIONSHIP LICENSED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES; AND
(II) PROVIDES A COPY OF THE AFFIDAVIT SUBMITTED TO THE
COUNTY BOARD VERIFYING THE INFORMAL KINSHIP CARE RELATIONSHIP.
[(d)] (E) (1) To determine the annual family income eligibility of an applicant
for a Guaranteed Access Grant, the Office or an institution of higher education that
complies with § 18–303.3 of this subtitle may not consider an amount received by the
applicant as an earned income credit under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) When awarding a Guaranteed Access Grant to a student who
prequalified for the award under subsection [(e)(1)] (F)(1) or (2) of this section, the
Commission shall use the annual family income determination used when the student
prequalified.
[(e)] (F) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a student
in grade 7 or grade 8 who applies and qualifies for a Guaranteed Access Grant on the basis
of financial need as established by the Commission shall prequalify for a Guaranteed Access
Grant to be used at the time of enrollment in an institution of higher education by agreeing
in writing, as a secondary and undergraduate student, to:
(i) Satisfy the attendance policy of the applicable school;
(ii) Provide information required by the Commission or the State
Board of Education;

SENATE BILL 755
(iii) Apply for admission to an institution of higher education during
the student’s senior year of high school;
(iv) Complete and file on a timely basis applications for federal
student aid for each year that the student plans to enroll in postsecondary education;
(v) Participate in the Next Generation Scholars of Maryland
Program established in § 18–303.1 of this subtitle until the student graduates from high
school and matriculates at an institution of higher education;
(vi) Maintain a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.5 on a
4.0 scale or its equivalent; and
(vii) Satisfy any other program requirements set by the Office, the
Commission, the State Board of Education, or the State Department of Education.
(2) A student in grade 9 or grade 10 shall prequalify for a Guaranteed
Access Grant to be used at the time of enrollment in an institution of higher education if
the student:
(i) Otherwise meets the conditions of paragraph (1) of this
subsection; and
(ii) 1. Is eligible for free or reduced priced meals; or
2. Attends a school that participates in the U.S. Department
of Agriculture Community Eligibility Provision and the student is identified by:
A. Direct certification; or
B. Income information provided by the family of the student
to the local school system on an alternative form developed by the Department.
18–303.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fund” means the Next Generation Scholars of Maryland Program
Fund.
(3) “Program” means the Next Generation Scholars of Maryland Program.
(b) The Commission, in collaboration with the Department, county boards of
education, county superintendents, and institutions of higher education, shall administer
the Next Generation Scholars of Maryland Program.

SENATE BILL 755 5
(c) The Program shall provide guidance and services to students who qualify for
a Guaranteed Access Grant in accordance with [§ 18–303(e)] § 18–303(F) of this subtitle
and students who qualify to receive free or reduced–price lunch under the National School
Lunch Program to assist the students in successfully:
(1) Completing a college preparatory curriculum;
(2) Graduating from high school;
(3) Matriculating at an institution of higher education as defined in §
18–303 of this subtitle; and
(4) Making timely progress to complete a degree program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.